Washington statutes.
RCW 28A.300.220

Cooperation with workforce training and education coordinating board.

The superintendent shall cooperate with the workforce training and education coordinating board in the conduct of the board's responsibilities under RCW 28C.18.060 and shall provide information and data in a format that is accessible to the board.

[ 1991 c 238 s 78.]

NOTES: